Washington statutes.
RCW 43.20.280

Action plan for eliminating health disparities—Council meetings—Reports to the legislature.

The council shall consider in its deliberations and by 2012, create an action plan for eliminating health disparities. The action plan must address, but is not limited to, the following diseases, conditions, and health indicators: Diabetes, asthma, infant mortality, HIV/AIDS, heart disease, strokes, breast cancer, cervical cancer, prostate cancer, chronic kidney disease, sudden infant death syndrome (SIDS), mental health, women's health issues, smoking cessation, oral disease, and immunization rates of children and senior citizens. The council shall prioritize the diseases, conditions, and health indicators according to prevalence and severity of the health disparity. The council shall address these priorities on an incremental basis by adding no more than five of the diseases, conditions, and health indicators to each update or revised version of the action plan. The action plan shall be updated biannually. The council shall meet as often as necessary but not less than two times per calendar year. The council shall report its progress with the action plan to the governor and the legislature no later than January 15, 2008. A second report shall be presented no later than January 15, 2010, and a third report from the council shall be presented to the governor and the legislature no later than January 15, 2012. Thereafter, the governor and legislature shall require progress updates from the council every four years in odd-numbered years. The action plan shall recognize the need for flexibility.

[ 2006 c 239 s 4.]